Utah statutes.
34A-5-108.   Judicial enforcement of division findings.
(1)  The commission or the attorney general at the request of the commission
shall commence an action under Section 63G-4-501 for civil enforcement of a
final order of the commission issued under Subsection 34A-5-107(11) if:
(a)  the order finds that there is reasonable cause to believe that a
respondent has engaged or is engaging in discriminatory or prohibited
employment practices made unlawful by this chapter;
(b)  counsel to the commission or the attorney general determines after
reasonable inquiry that the order is well grounded in fact and is warranted by
existing law;
(c)  the respondent has not received an order of automatic stay or discharge
from the United States Bankruptcy Court; and
(d) (i)  the commission has not accepted a conciliation agreement to which the
aggrieved party and respondent are parties; or
(ii)  the respondent has not conciliated or complied with the final order of
the commission within 30 days from the date the order is issued.
(2)  If the respondent seeks judicial review of the final order under Section
63G-4-403, pursuant to Section 63G-4-405 the commission may stay seeking civil
enforcement pending the completion of the judicial review.
